th: ประเภทของกระสุน: บีบีกัน; ลูกดอกปืนเป่า; ตลับกระสุน; ลูกดอกโฟม; ลูกปืนอัดลม; ลูกกระสุนกลม; กระสุนลูกโดด; กระสุน TSS; อื่นๆ
hr-HR: Vrsta projektila: Airsoft kuglice; Strelica za puhaljku; Metak; Pjenasta strelica; Dijabola; Okrugla kuglica; Jedinačni metak; Sačma od volframa (TSS); Ostalo
da: Projektiltype: Airsoft BB; Pusterørspil; Patron; Skumpil; Hagl; Rundkugle; Slug; TSS-hagl; Andet
bg-BG: Тип снаряд: Еърсофт сачми (BB); Стреличка за фунийка; Патрон; Стреличка от пяна; Чашка (за въздушно оръжие); Кръгла сачма; Проектил (slug); TSS сачми; Друго
nl: Projectiel type: Airsoft-BB; Blaaspijppijltje; Patroon; Schuimpijltje; Pellet; Ronde bal; Slug; TSS-hagel; Anders
sk-SK: Typ projektilu: Airsoftové guľôčky (BB); Šípka do fúkačky; Náboj; Penová šípka; Peleta; Guľka; Jednotná strela (slug); Broky TSS; Iné
el: Τύπος βλήματος: Μπίλιες Airsoft; Βελάκι φυσοκάλαμου; Φυσίγγιο; Βελάκι από αφρώδες υλικό; Σφαιρίδιο (Pellet); Στρογγυλή μπίλια; Μονόβολο; Σκάγια TSS; Άλλο
zh-CN: 弹丸类型: 软气枪 BB 弹; 吹箭飞镖; 弹药筒/弹壳; 泡沫飞镖; 铅弹/丸粒; 圆球; 独头弹; TSS 弹丸; 其他
cs: Typ projektilu: Airsoftové kuličky (BB); Šipka do foukačky; Nábojnice; Pěnová šipka; Diabolka; Kulička; Jednotná střela; TSS broky; Ostatní
ro-RO: Tipul proiectilului: Bile Airsoft; Săgeată de sarbacană; Cartuș; Săgeți de spumă; Alice; Bilă rotundă; Proiectil unic (slug); Alice TSS; Altele
en: Projectile type: Airsoft BB; Blowgun dart; Cartridge; Foam dart; Pellet; Round ball; Slug; TSS shot; Other
fi: Ammuksen tyyppi: Airsoft-kuula; Puhallusputken nuoli; Patruuna; Vaahtomuovinuoli; Ilmakiväärin luoti; Pyöreä kuula; Täyteinen; TSS-haulit; Muu
sv: Projektiltyp: Airsoft-kulor (BB); Blåsrörspil; Patron; Skumpil; Diabol; Rundkula; Slug; TSS-hagel; Övrigt
fr: Type de projectile: Bille d’airsoft; Fléchette de sarbacane; Cartouche; Fléchette en mousse; Plomb; Bille ronde; Balle; Grenaille TSS; Autre
pt-PT: Tipo de projétil: BB de airsoft; Dardo de zarabatana; Cartucho; Dardo de espuma; Chumbo; Bola redonda; Balote; Chumbo TSS; Outro
es: Tipo de proyectil: Balín de airsoft; Dardo de cerbatana; Cartucho; Dardo de espuma; Perdigón; Bola redonda; Slug; Perdigón TSS; Otro
tr: Mermi tipi: Airsoft BB; Üfleme borusu dartı; Kartuş; Sünger dart; Saçma; Yuvarlak mermi; Tek kurşun; TSS saçması; Diğer
zh-TW: 彈丸類型: 軟氣槍 BB 彈; 吹箭; 彈藥筒; 泡棉飛鏢; 鉛彈; 圓球; 獨頭彈; TSS 散彈; 其他
ru: Тип снаряда: Шарики для страйкбола (BB); Дротик для духовой трубки; Патрон; Поролоновый дротик; Пулька; Круглая пуля; Гладкая пуля; Дробь TSS; Другое
vi: Loại đạn: Đạn BB airsoft; Phi tiêu ống thổi; Đạn lắp nguyên viên; Phi tiêu xốp; Đạn chì; Bóng tròn; Đạn slug; Đạn TSS; Khác
sl-SI: Vrsta izstrelka: Kroglice Airsoft BB; Puščica za pihalnik; Naboj; Penasta puščica; Diabola; Okrogla kroglica; Izstrelek (slug); Šibra TSS; Drugo
ja: 発射体の種類: エアガン用BB弾; 吹き矢ダーツ; カートリッジ; フォームダーツ; ペレット; ラウンドボール; スラッグ; TSSショット; その他
it: Tipo di proiettile: Pallini da softair (BB); Dardo per cerbottana; Cartuccia; Dardo di spugna; Piombino; Palla tonda; Proiettile; Pallini TSS; Altro
pt-BR: Projétil tipo: Esfera de airsoft (BB); Dardo de zarabatana; Cartucho; Dardo de espuma; Chumbinho; Bola redonda; Balote; Chumbo TSS; Outro
nb: Prosjektiltype: Airsoft-kuler (BB); Blåserørpil; Patron; Skumpil; Pellets; Rund kule; Sylinderkulet; TSS-hagl; Annet
hu: Lövedék típusa: Airsoft BB; Fúvócső-lövedék; Patron; Szivacslövedék; Pellet; Kerek golyó; Slug; TSS sörét; Egyéb
de: Projektiltyp: Airsoft-BB; Blasrohrpfeil; Patrone; Schaumstoff-Dart; Pellet; Rundkugel; Slug; TSS-Schrot; Sonstige
lt-LT: Sviedinio tipas: „Airsoft“ šrateliai; Spjaudyklės strėlytė; Kasetė; Putplasčio strėlytė; Šratas; Apvalus šratas; Vientisa kulka; TSS šratai; Kita
ko: 발사체 유형: 에어소프트 BB탄; 블로우건 다트; 카트리지; 폼 다트; 펠릿; 라운드 볼; 슬러그; TSS 샷; 기타
pl: Typ pocisku: Kulka ASG; Strzałka do dmuchawki; Nabój; Piankowa strzałka; Śrut; Kula; Pocisk typu slug; Śrut TSS; Inny